Missouri, session 2026, HB1753.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 302, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 302.360, to read as follows:
302.360. 1. Beginning August 28, 2028, any driver's license applicant required
under this chapter to take a road skills test shall successfully complete an online road
safety course prior to taking the road skills test. The online road safety course shall
consist of at least five hours of instruction on the following:
(1) The hazards of distracted or impaired driving;
(2) Vehicle-related crash and fatality awareness and prevention;
(3) Common safe driving habits; and
(4) Law enforcement procedures for traffic stops and appropriate interactions,
including drivers' and passengers' rights.
2. Before January 1, 2028, the department of public safety shall develop and
accredit, or contract with a third-party organization to develop and accredit, an online
road safety course. The department of public safety shall consult and collaborate with
appropriate traffic safety organizations regarding the course curriculum.
3. The department of revenue shall integrate the course onto its website for
accessibility to the public.
4. The Missouri state highway patrol shall ensure that only persons who have
successfully completed the online road safety course are permitted to take the road skills
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1753 2
test. The department of revenue shall maintain a secure, electronic database of all
persons who have completed the course, which shall be made accessible to the Missouri
state highway patrol for verification purposes.
5. The online road safety course shall be accessible to applicants without charge
prior to completion. Upon successful completion of the course, the department of
revenue is authorized to collect a reasonable fee, not to exceed twenty dollars, from each
applicant. If the course is developed and administered by a third-party organization, all
fees collected shall be paid to that organization. If the course is administered by the
department of public safety, all fees collected shall be deposited into the driver safety
education fund established under subsection 6 of this section and used solely for the
administration, maintenance, and improvement of the course.
6. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Driver Safety Education
Fund", which shall consist of moneys collected under subsection 5 of this section. The
state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and
30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated
fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used solely as provided in
this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
7. The department of revenue shall waive the online road safety course
requirement of this section if the applicant provides proof that they successfully
completed a classroom-based driver's education course in high school.
8. The provisions of this section shall not apply to persons applying for a
commercial driver's license.
9. The director of the department of public safety may promulgate all necessary
rules and regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul

HB 1753 3
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔